Hawaii statutes.
[§425E-804] Power of general
partner and person dissociated as general partner to bind partnership after
dissolution. (a) A limited partnership shall be bound by a
general partner's act after dissolution that:

(1) Is appropriate for winding up the limited
partnership's activities; or

(2) Would have bound the
limited partnership under section 425E-402 before dissolution, if, at the time
the other party enters into the transaction, the other party does not have
notice of the dissolution.

(b) A person dissociated as a general partner
binds a limited partnership through an act occurring after dissolution if:

(1) At the time the other party enters into the
transaction:

(A) Less than two years has passed since the
dissociation; and

(B) The other party does not have notice of
the dissociation and reasonably believes that the person is a general partner;
and

(2) The act:

(A) Is appropriate for winding up the limited
partnership's activities; or

(B) Would have bound the limited partnership
under section 425E-402 before dissolution and at the time the other party
enters into the transaction the other party does not have notice of the
dissolution. [L 2003, c 210, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol08_Ch0401-0429
Next